Florida, session 2026, HB51.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 220.1985, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb51-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 51 2026
220.1985 Tax credits for employee housing.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Converted housing" means property that was sitting
idle, unoccupied, unused, or abandoned for at least 24 months
before being rehabilitated to serve as workforce housing.
(b) "Employee" has the same meaning as established under
the federal Fair Labor Standards Act and its implementing
regulations, and includes an apprentice, as defined in s.
446.021(2), a preapprentice, as defined in s. 446.021(1), or a
student intern, as defined in s. 220.198(2).
(c) "Homeless" means a person who:
1. Meets the definition of homeless as that term is
defined in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C
s. 11302; or
2. Is experiencing a temporary state of lacking a
permanent home due to a sudden crisis or catastrophic event such
as job loss, a natural disaster, a medical emergency, or
domestic violence.
(d) "Qualified business" means a business which provides
housing for a qualified employee at a rate that does not exceed
the rent limit specified for the 50 percentage category by the
most recent multifamily rental programs income and rent limit
chart posted by the Florida Housing Finance Corporation.
(e) "Qualified employee" means an employee who was
homeless immediately before receiving housing from a qualified
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb51-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 51 2026
business, and who first received such housing within the
previous 3 years.
(2)(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, a qualified business is eligible for a credit against the
tax imposed by this chapter in the amount of $2,000 per
qualified employee.
(b) The qualified business is eligible for an additional
credit against the tax imposed by this chapter in the amount of
$1,000 per qualified employee if the housing provided by the
qualified business is converted housing owned by the qualified
business. The converted housing must meet all building, housing,
and health codes, as defined in s. 83.43.
(3)(a) In order to receive a tax credit under this
section, the qualified business must submit an application to
the Department of Commerce that identifies the number of
qualified employees, the location of the provided housing and
whether such housing is converted housing, the rent charged to
the qualified employees, and any other information required by
the department.
(b) Subject to the provisions of subsection (4), the
Department of Commerce shall review applications with urgency
and approve all those determined to:
1. Contain all the information required by this
subsection; and
2. Meet the criteria set out in this section.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb51-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 51 2026
(c) The Department of Commerce shall notify the qualified
business, in writing, of their decision and, if applicable, the
maximum credit allowed. The Department of Commerce shall
transmit a copy of such notification to the Department of
Revenue.
(4) The combined total amount of tax credits which may be
granted to qualified businesses each year under this section is
$5 million. The Department of Commerce must approve the tax
credit prior to the taxpayer taking the credit on a return, and
the return attempting to apply the credit must include a copy of
such approval. The Department of Commerce must approve credits
on a first-come, first-served basis.
(5) The Department of Commerce and the Department of
Revenue may adopt rules, including emergency rules pursuant to
s. 120.54(4), governing the manner and form of applications for
the tax credit and establishing qualification requirements for
the tax credit. All conditions are deemed met for the adoption
of emergency rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4).
(6) A qualified business may carry forward any unused
portion of a tax credit under this section for up to 2 taxable
years, but the credit may not be transferred to another entity.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb51-00